Tennessee, session 114, SB1109.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 37-1-903(c)(2), is amended by
deleting the last two sentences of the subdivision and substituting:
Each zero to three court program and safe baby court shall submit program data and an
annual report as described in this subdivision (c)(2) to the department of children's
services, the department of mental health and substance abuse services, the
administrative office of the courts, and the council of juvenile and family court judges by
February 1 of each year.
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
SB1109
003292
- 1 -